Maine, session 132, LD1843.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 34-B MRSA §3614 is enacted to read:
§3614. Peer respite services
1. Definition. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, "peer
respite" means a community-based model of care in which an individual in need of precrisis
or crisis support can access nonclinical community mental health services from peers with
lived experience in a low-barrier, comfortable and safe setting.
2. Peer respite services and center. The department shall provide peer respite
services and establish one peer respite center. The center must provide 24-hour peer respite
services to individuals 18 year of age or older in need of voluntary, short-term mental health
services.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Office of Behavioral Health Z199
Initiative: Provides funding for a peer respite services program to provide short-term
mental health services to adults.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $575,000 $500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $575,000 $500,000